Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission,  for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $68,022,397.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $555,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140 to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, for veterans’ specialty
courts.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$4,689,073 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,339,173 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon  Criminal Justice
Commission.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 10, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 18, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 2